California statutes. Vehicle Code
In approving the additional instruction and training required under subdivision (b) of Section 680, the department shall consider the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 40080) of Part 23.5 of the Education Code, as those provisions relate to instruction and training requirements for schoolbus drivers and school pupil activity bus drivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 654.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2424.

(a) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may enter into agreements with providers of towing, emergency road, and storage services for the purpose of determining which providers shall be summoned by the department when those services are necessary for public assistance or to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the department. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to the agreements. The department shall confer with the towing industry, as necessary, to reach agreements mutually beneficial to the public, the towing industry, and the department. 

(b) This section does not prohibit a member of the public from selecting any vehicle towing, emergency road service, or storage provider, except when towing or storage is ordered by a member of the department under the provisions of law. 

(c) These agreements shall be implemented in cooperation with representatives of the towing industry, and shall include, but not be limited to, the following subjects: liability insurance requirements, towing, emergency road service, and storage fees, inspection of business and storage facilities and equipment, recordkeeping, minimum equipment requirements, and the establishment of tow districts. 

(d) Failure of a towing, emergency road service, or storage provider to comply with the provisions of the agreement may result in the suspension or termination of the agreement. In the event of suspension or termination of the agreement, and at the request of the towing, emergency road service, or storage provider, the department shall provide a hearing and appeal process to the provider. 

(e) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the hearing and appeal process specified in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2426.

The department shall prepare a one-page information sheet describing its Designated Driver Program. The sheet shall include information concerning the person or entity an alcoholic beverage licensee may contact for assistance in establishing a Designated Driver Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1337, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2427.

Whenever the department submits the fingerprints of an applicant for a license or certificate to the Department of Justice, and is required to pay a fee pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department, without the necessity of adopting regulations, shall charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse the department for that fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2428.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol may fix the cost or pro rata share, or, in its discretion, an amount it considers equivalent to the cost or pro rata share, and collect from each state agency in advance or upon any other basis that it may determine the cost of providing protective services for state employees and property.

(b) Payments for services provided shall be made by direct transfer as described in Section 11255 of the Government Code. All money received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Protective Services Fund, which is hereby created. When appropriated by the Legislature, funds in the Protective Services Fund shall be used by the department to fulfill those responsibilities set forth in subdivisions (g), (h), and (i) of Section 2400.

(c) If a state agency refuses to pay the charges fixed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol for security services rendered, the department may file a claim for those charges against any appropriations made for the support or maintenance of all or any part of the work and affairs of the state agency. The Controller shall draw his or her warrant in accordance with law upon the claim in favor of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.

The department shall develop an “800” telephone number system to facilitate public reporting of violations of Article 2 (commencing with Section 31400) of Chapter 5 of Division 13. The department shall include in the department’s “El Protector Program” public outreach activities that publicize the “800” telephone number system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.3.

(a) The commissioner shall appoint a committee of 12 members to develop a public awareness and outreach campaign to educate manufacturers, sellers, and owners of house cars, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 12804.10, regarding locations where those vehicles may be legally operated within the state. The committee shall consist of the commissioner, two members representing owners or operators of house cars, and one representative from each of the following:

(1) The Department of Transportation.

(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles.

(3) The Recreational Vehicle Industry Association.

(4) The California Recreational Vehicle Dealers Association.

(5) The National Recreational Vehicle Dealers Association.

(6) The Family Motor Coach Association.

(7) The Good Sam Club.

(8) The recreational vehicle manufacturing industry.

(9) The California Travel Parks Association.

(b) The committee shall develop a driver education safety video for operators of house cars. The video, as well as a map of the approved highways on which those vehicles may operate, shall be made available to dealers of house cars. The committee shall encourage dealers to make copies of the video and map available to purchasers of those vehicles. The video shall be produced at no cost to the state.

(c) Committee members shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and without compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.5.

The department, in cooperation with county and local farm bureaus, shall provide a program to educate growers and farmers and farm labor vehicle owners and drivers regarding farm labor vehicle certification requirements, including, but not limited to, certification requirements for farm labor vehicle drivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 556, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.7.

(a) The commissioner shall appoint an impaired driving task force to develop recommendations for best practices, protocols, proposed legislation, and other policies that will address the issue of impaired driving, including driving under the influence of cannabis and controlled substances. The task force shall also examine the use of technology, including field testing technologies and validated field sobriety tests, to identify drivers under the influence of prescription drugs, cannabis, and controlled substances. The task force shall include, but is not limited to, the commissioner, who shall serve as chairperson, and at least one member from each of the following:

(1) The Office of Traffic Safety.

(2) The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

(3) Local law enforcement.

(4) District attorneys.

(5) Public defenders.

(6) California Association of Crime Laboratory Directors.

(7) California Attorneys for Criminal Justice.

(8) The California Cannabis Research Program, known as the Center for Medicinal Cannabis Research, authorized pursuant to Section 11362.9 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) An organization that represents medicinal cannabis patients.

(10) Licensed physicians with expertise in substance abuse disorder treatment.

(11) Researchers with expertise in identifying impairment caused by prescription medications and controlled substances.

(12) Nongovernmental organizations committed to social justice issues.

(13) A nongovernmental organization that focuses on improving roadway safety.

(b) The members of the task force shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and without compensation.

(c) The task force members shall be free of economic relationships with any company that profits from the sale of technologies or equipment that is intended to identify impairment.
 Members and their organizations shall not receive pay from, grants from, or any form of financial support from companies or entities that sell such technologies or equipment.

(d) The task force shall make recommendations regarding prevention of impaired driving, means of identifying impaired driving, and responses to impaired driving that reduce reoccurrence, including, but not limited to, evidence-based approaches that do not rely on incarceration.

(e) The task force shall make recommendations regarding how to best capture data to evaluate the impact that cannabis legalization is having on roadway safety.

(f) By January 1, 2021, the task force shall report to the Legislature its policy recommendations and the steps state agencies are taking regarding impaired driving. The report shall be submitted in compliance with
 Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 173.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.9.

(a) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall make the following available to city and county law enforcement agencies subject to this section:

(1) At no charge, training on enforcement of laws related to commercial vehicles, as defined in Section 260 of the California Vehicle Code, including, but not limited to, truck route enforcement.

(2) Course completion certificates for city and county law enforcement personnel who have completed the training described in paragraph (1).

(b) All jurisdictions
 that are required to update a circulation element or to adopt an ordinance pursuant to Section 65098.1 of the Government Code shall have at least one enforcement officer that has received a completion certificate pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) by the date upon which that circulation element is updated or ordinance is adopted.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the department to provide training for which it has not received funding or to require a jurisdiction to have an enforcement officer that has received a course completion certificate if the department has not made the training described in subdivision (a) available to law enforcement personnel at no charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 316, Sec. 16.   (SB 415)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Tow Truck Drivers [2430.1. - 2432.3.]

2430.1.

As used in this article, each of the following terms has the following meaning:

(a) “Tow truck driver” means a person who operates a tow truck, who renders towing service or emergency road service to motorists while involved in freeway service patrol operations, pursuant to an agreement with a regional or local entity, and who has or will have direct and personal contact with the individuals being transported or assisted. As used in this subdivision, “towing service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2436.

(b) “Employer” means a person or organization that employs those persons defined in subdivision (a), or who is an owner-operator who performs the activity specified in subdivision (a), and who is involved in freeway service patrol operations pursuant to an agreement or contract with a regional or local entity.

(c) “Regional or local entity” means a public organization established as a public transportation planning entity pursuant to Title 7.1 (commencing with Section 66500) of the Government Code or authorized to impose a transaction and use tax for transportation purposes by the Public Utilities Code or the service authority for freeway emergencies described in Section 2551 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(d) “Emergency road service” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2436.

(e) “Freeway service patrol” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2561 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2430.2.

“Regional or local entity,” as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 2430.1, also includes the transportation planning entity established pursuant to Section 130050.1 of the Public Utilities Code or the service authority for freeway emergencies described in Section 2551 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2430.3.

(a) Every freeway service patrol tow truck driver and any California Highway Patrol rotation tow truck operator shall notify each of his or her employers and prospective employers and the Department of the California Highway Patrol of an arrest or conviction of any crime specified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13377 prior to beginning the next workshift for that employer.

(b) For the purpose of conducting criminal history and driver history checks of any California Highway Patrol rotation tow truck operator, the commissioner may utilize the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 127, Sec. 5.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2430.5.

(a) Every employer intending to hire a tow truck driver on or after July 1, 1992, shall require the applicant for employment to submit a temporary tow truck driver certificate issued by the department or a permanent tow truck driver certificate issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The employer shall review the certificate and obtain a copy to be maintained as required by subdivision (c). The employer shall not hire any tow truck driver in any freeway service patrol operations who does not provide a temporary tow truck driver certificate issued by the department or a permanent tow truck driver certificate issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The employer shall not allow a tow truck driver who is not certified to participate in any freeway service patrol operations. If the issuance date on the certificate is more than 90 days from the proposed date of hire, the employer shall contact the department to reverify eligibility.

(b) On or after July 1, 1992, every employer, whose currently employed tow truck drivers are required to obtain a tow truck driver certificate pursuant to Section 12520, shall require the employees to submit to the employer a temporary tow truck driver certificate issued by the department or a permanent tow truck driver certificate issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The employer shall review the certificate and obtain a copy to be maintained as required by subdivision (c).

(c) Every employer shall maintain a tow truck driver certificate file for all tow truck drivers hired on or after July 1, 1992, or all currently employed tow truck drivers who are required to obtain a tow truck driver certificate pursuant to Section 12520. The employer shall retain employee rosters and copies of tow truck driver certificates for all tow truck drivers. The roster shall be comprised of the following two lists:

(1) Drivers who have valid tow truck driver certificates.

(2) Drivers who would be prohibited, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13377, from involvement in any freeway service patrol operation. 

Every employer shall make available for inspection by the department at the employer’s primary place of business in this state. In addition, the employer shall maintain a personnel roster, also available for inspection, of all current tow truck drivers and their date of hire by the employer. 

(d) Upon notification that a tow truck driver has been arrested for, or convicted of, any crime specified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13377, the employer shall remove that tow truck driver from any position involving freeway service patrol operations. 

(e) A violation of this section by an employer is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2431.

(a) For the purposes of conducting criminal history and driver history screening of tow truck drivers and employers, the commissioner shall do all of the following:

(1) Obtain fingerprints from tow truck drivers and employers. The fingerprint cards will be submitted to the Department of Justice for criminal history checks.

(2) Obtain a second set of fingerprints from applicants who have not continuously resided in the state for the previous seven years, and submit that card to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for out-of-state criminal history checks. The department may charge a fee sufficient to cover the additional
 expense of processing the fingerprint cards through the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(3) Verify that the tow truck driver or employer, or both, have a valid California driver’s license, through the use of the automated records system.

(b) On and after July 1, 1992, all tow truck drivers shall submit an application for the issuance of a tow truck driver certificate with the department and pay an application fee equal to the actual costs of a criminal history check and issuance of the tow truck driver’s certificate, but not more than fifty dollars ($50). Applicants for the renewal of an expired tow truck driver certificate or applicants for a duplicate tow truck driver certificate shall submit an application for issuance of a new tow truck driver certificate to the Department of Motor Vehicles and pay an application fee of twelve dollars ($12).

All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. An amount equal to the fees paid shall be made available, upon appropriation, to the Department of Motor Vehicles for its administrative costs, for the cost of criminal history checks to be conducted by the Department of Justice, and to the department for its administrative costs. In no case shall the fees collected exceed the costs of administering this section.

(c) Applicants for an original tow truck driver certificate shall be fingerprinted by the department, on a form issued by the department, for submission to the Department of Justice for the purpose of determining whether the applicant has been convicted for a violation of a crime specified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13377.

(d) Information released to the department or the Department of Motor Vehicles shall be related to their inquiry and shall remain confidential.

(e) The department shall issue a temporary tow truck driver certificate, provided by the Department of Motor Vehicles, to applicants who have cleared the specified criminal history check pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the driver history check through the automated records system, and who meet all other applicable provisions of this code. The term of the temporary tow truck driver’s certificate shall be for a period of 90 days from the date of issuance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   (SB 938)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2432.

(a) It is unlawful for a freeway service patrol tow truck driver to knowingly provide false information on the application prepared and submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2431.

(b) It is unlawful for a California Highway Patrol rotation tow truck operator, including, but not limited to, a freeway service patrol tow truck driver, to fail to comply with the notification requirements in Section 2430.3.

(c) A violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 127, Sec. 6.   Effective July 30, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2432.1.

(a) If the commissioner determines that an employer has failed to comply with the requirements of this article or Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 2435), the commissioner may, after a hearing, suspend the highway safety carrier’s identification number issued pursuant to Section 2436.3 for a period not to exceed two years. 

(b) If the commissioner determines that an employer has failed to comply with the requirements of this article or Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 2435) twice within a period of 24 consecutive months, the commissioner may, after a hearing, prohibit the employer from participating in any freeway service patrol operation for two years. 

(c) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the hearing specified in subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2432.3.

(a) This article does not preempt the authority of any city, city and county, or county to regulate, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 21100, any of the matters covered by this article.

(b) (1) For the purposes of verifying the criminal history of individuals involved in the operation of tow truck services, law enforcement agencies of any city, city and county, or county may conduct criminal history checks for all of the following:

(A) Applicants for employment to drive tow trucks. 

(B) Those who drive tow trucks. 

(C) Tow truck owners-operators.

(2) The law enforcement agency may obtain the fingerprints of the individuals on a form approved by the Department of Justice and provided by the agency. The fingerprint samples shall be submitted to the Department of Justice for the purpose of determining whether the individual has been convicted of any violation, including, but not limited to, Section 220, subdivision (1), (2), (3), or (4) of Section 261, or Section 264.1, 267, 288, or 289 of the Penal Code, or any felony or three misdemeanors as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5164 of the Public Resources Code.

(3) For purposes of conducting criminal history screening of tow truck driver applicants, employees, and employers who have not resided continuously in the state for the previous seven years, the law enforcement agency of any city, city and county, or county, may obtain a second set of fingerprints, when necessary, and may submit that card to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for out-of-state criminal history checks. 

(c) The law enforcement agency of any city, city and county, or county may charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of obtaining and processing the fingerprint cards through the Department of Justice. 

(d) For the purposes of conducting driver history screening of applicants to drive tow trucks, employees, and owners-operators, the law enforcement agency of any city, city and county, or county may verify that the applicant or owner-operator, as the case may be, has a valid California driver’s license of the proper class, through the use of the automated records system. 

(e) The Department of Justice shall develop a procedure whereby it will notify the requesting law enforcement agency if the person fingerprinted has been convicted of any of the specified crimes or is convicted of a specified crime subsequent to employment or beginning operation of a tow service. The Department of Justice shall release the requested information to the requesting agency. 

(f) Information released to the requesting agency may be utilized for licensing and regulating procedures established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 21100. 

(g) Information released to the requesting agency shall be related to its inquiry, shall remain confidential, and shall not be made public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 184, Sec. 5.   Effective July 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Emergency Roadside Assistance [2435. - 2436.7.]

2435.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the emergency roadside assistance provided by highway service organizations is a valuable service that benefits millions of California motorists. The Legislature further finds and declares that emergency roadside assistance is provided statewide, in cooperation with, and shares resources with, public safety agencies. The Legislature also finds that the Department of the California Highway Patrol, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, is responsible for the rapid removal of impediments to traffic on highways within the state and that the Department of the California Highway Patrol may enter into agreements with employers for freeway service patrol operations under an agreement or contract with a regional or local entity. The Legislature declares that it is important to the public safety that drivers who provide emergency roadside service not have criminal records that include violent crimes against persons.

(b) The Legislature also declares that the Department of the California Highway Patrol, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall be responsible for establishing the minimum training standards for highway service organization employees and employers who participate in freeway service patrol operations pursuant to an agreement or contract with a regional or local entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.

For the purposes of this article, each of the following terms has the meaning given in this section:

(a) “Emergency road service” is the adjustment, repair, or replacement by a highway service organization of the equipment, tires, or mechanical parts of a motor vehicle so as to permit it to be operated under its own power. “Towing service” is the drafting or moving by a highway service organization of a motor vehicle from one place to another under power other than its own.

(b) “Emergency roadside assistance” means towing service or emergency road service.

(c) “Employer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1.

(d) “Freeway service patrol” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2561 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) “Highway service organization” means a motor club, as defined by Section 12142 of the Insurance Code and, in addition, includes any person or organization that operates or directs the operation of highway service vehicles to provide emergency roadside assistance to motorists, or any person or organization that is reimbursed or reimburses others for the cost of providing emergency roadside assistance, and any employer and includes any person or organization that directly or indirectly, with or without compensation, provides emergency roadside assistance.

(f) “Regional or local entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1.

(g) “Tow truck driver” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2430.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 374, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.3.

(a) On and after July 1, 1992, every employer shall obtain from the department a carrier identification number. Application for a carrier identification number shall be on forms furnished by the department. The number shall be displayed on both sides of each tow truck utilized in any freeway service patrol operation, in accordance with Section 27907. 

(b) No employer shall operate a tow truck in any freeway service patrol operation if the carrier identification number issued pursuant to subdivision (a) has been suspended by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2432.1. 

(c) The carrier identification number shall be removed before sale, transfer, or other disposal of the vehicle, or upon termination of an agreement or contract for freeway service patrol operations. 

(d) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.5.

(a) The department, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, shall provide training, pursuant to a reimbursable agreement or contract with a regional or local entity, for all employers and tow truck drivers who are involved in freeway service patrol operations pursuant to an agreement or contract with the regional or local entity. Dispatchers for freeway service patrol operations shall be employees of the department or the Department of Transportation. 

(b) The training shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: 

(1) Tow truck driver and motorist safety. 

(2) Patrol responsibility. 

(3) Vehicle operation. 

(4) Traffic control and scene management.

(5) Communication procedures. 

(6) Demeanor and courtesy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.7.

(a) Every tow truck driver and employer, involved in a freeway service patrol operation under an agreement or contract with a regional or local entity, shall attend the training specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2436.5. 

(b) Upon successful completion of the training, each trainee shall be issued a certificate of completion. The certificate shall state the name of the training organization, the name and signature of the trainer, the name of the trainee, and the date of completion of the training. 

(c) The trainee shall provide a copy of the certificate of training to the employer. The employer shall maintain this information in the tow truck driver files established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2430.5. 

(d) Every employer shall make the file available for inspection by the department at the employer’s primary place of business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Highway Spill Containment and Abatement of Hazardous Substances [2450. - 2454.]

2450.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Hazardous Substances Highway Spill Containment and Abatement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 922, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2451.

The Legislature finds and declares that a statewide program for the management of hazardous substances highway spills, under the jurisdiction of the California Highway Patrol, is necessary to protect the public health and environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 922, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2452.

“Hazardous substance” means any hazardous material defined in Section 353 and any toxic substance defined pursuant to Section 108145 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 424.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.

The California Highway Patrol shall serve as statewide information, assistance, and notification coordinator for all hazardous substances spill incidents occurring on highways within the State of California. The California Highway Patrol shall establish a single notification mechanism to serve as a central focus point for a hazardous substances spill response system. To assure timely notification of emergency personnel, the notification mechanism established pursuant to this section shall complement and not conflict with the system established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8574.17 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1214, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.

(a) The authority for incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident is vested in the appropriate law enforcement agency having primary traffic investigative authority on the highway where the incident occurs. Responsibility for incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident shall continue until all emergency operations at the scene have been completed and order has been restored.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the local governing body of a city, whether general law or chartered, which has jurisdiction over the location where an on-highway hazardous substance incident occurs may assign the authority for incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident on local streets and roads, other than freeways, to either the local law enforcement agency or the local fire protection agency. However, the department is responsible for incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident on all highways where the department has primary traffic investigative authority. Any law enforcement agency having primary traffic investigative authority may enter into written agreements with other public agencies to facilitate incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident on local streets and roads other than freeways.

(c) For purposes of this section, “incident command at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident” means coordination of operations which occur at the location of a hazardous substance incident. This coordinating function does not include how the specialized functions provided by the various other responding agencies are to be performed. The incident commander at the scene of an on-highway hazardous substance incident shall consult with other response agencies at the scene to ensure that all appropriate resources are properly utilized, and shall perform his or her coordinating function in a manner designed to minimize the risk of death or injury to other persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Renderers and Transporters of Inedible Kitchen Grease [2460. - 2482.]

2460.

(a) The definitions set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 19200) of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code apply for purposes of interpreting this article. The definitions set forth elsewhere in this section also apply for purposes of interpreting this article.

(b) A “licensed renderer” is a renderer licensed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 19300) of Chapter 5 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(c) A “registered transporter” is a transporter of inedible kitchen grease registered under Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 19310) of Chapter 5 of Part 3
 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(d) A “peace officer” is any peace officer defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(e) A “container” is a receptacle, including, but not limited to, a box, barrel, tank, or jar, for holding meat or meat products, poultry meat or poultry meat products, animal carcasses or parts, inedible kitchen grease, packinghouse waste, or other such items.

(f) A “manifest” is a written or electronic record that contains information required by Section 1180.24 of Article 42 of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(g) “Transportation” means the movement of inedible kitchen grease and the loading, unloading, or
 storage incidental to that movement.

(h) “Inedible kitchen grease” means any fat or used cooking grease or oils from any source.

(i) “Rendering” means all recycling, processing, and conversion of animal and fish materials and carcasses and inedible kitchen grease into fats, oils, proteins, and other products that are used in the animal, poultry, and pet food industries and other industries.

(j) “Collection center” means a receiving area for the temporary storage of animal carcasses, packinghouse waste, or other products before transportation to a licensed rendering plant or pet food processor.

(k) “Licensed collection center” means a collection center licensed pursuant to Section 19300.5 of the Food and Agricultural
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 10.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2462.

(a) In addition to any other records required to be maintained and retained pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code, each licensed renderer and collection center shall record and maintain for two years, in connection with the receipt of kitchen grease that is not intended for human food, all of the information required by Section 1180.24 of Article 42 of Subchapter 2 of Chapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The name of each registered transporter of inedible kitchen grease who has delivered that material to the licensed renderer or collection center.

(2) The total amount of inedible kitchen grease purchased in each transaction.

(3) The date of delivery for each transaction.

(b) Each registered transporter shall record and maintain for two years a manifest that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The name and address of each location from which the registered transporter obtained the inedible kitchen grease.

(2) The quantity of inedible kitchen grease received from each location.

(3) The date on which the inedible kitchen grease was obtained from each location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 11.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2464.

All records required to be retained pursuant to this article shall be maintained and retained at the regular place of business of each licensed renderer, collection center, and registered transporter for two years. Those records shall be exhibited on demand to any peace officer or authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 12.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2466.

A peace officer or an authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Department of Food and Agriculture may, during normal business hours, inspect any premises maintained by a licensed renderer, collection center, or registered transporter, and any inedible kitchen grease located on the premises, for the purpose of determining whether that renderer, collection center, or transporter is complying with the record maintenance requirements of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 595, Sec. 13.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2468.

(a) A licensed renderer, collection center, or registered transporter who fails in any respect to keep the records required by this article, or to set out in that record any matter required by this article to be set out in the record, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
